Maine, session 132, LD1233.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4008, sub-§3, ¶M, as amended by PL 2023, c. 151, §8, is
further amended to read:
M. Law enforcement authorities for entry into the National Crime Information Center
database of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and to a national information
clearinghouse for missing and exploited children operated pursuant to 42 United States
Code, Section 5773(b). Information disclosed pursuant to this paragraph is limited to
information on missing or abducted children or youth that is required to be disclosed
pursuant to 42 United States Code, Section 671(a)(35)(B); and
Sec. 2. 22 MRSA §4008, sub-§3, ¶N, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 151, §9, is
amended to read:
N. A party to a child protection proceeding and the attorney representing the party in
the proceeding, with protection for identity of reporters and other persons when
appropriate.; and
Sec. 3. 22 MRSA §4008, sub-§3, ¶O is enacted to read:
O. An agency or department involved in the placement of a child if a record of past
substance use or domestic abuse by a person being considered for custody of the child
exists.